Wyoming, session 2026, HB0091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-30-101 through 9-30-103 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 30
PROHIBITIONS ON USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
HB0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0258

9-30-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Artificial intelligence system" means any
machine-based system that, for any explicit or implicit
objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how
to generate outputs, including content, decisions,
predictions or recommendations that can influence physical
or virtual environments;

(ii) "Biometric data" means data generated by
measurements of a person's biological characteristics.
"Biometric data" includes a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye
retina or iris or any other unique biological pattern or
characteristic that is used to identify a specific person.
"Biometric data" shall not include:

(A) A physical or digital photograph or
data generated from a physical or digital photograph;

HB0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0258
(B) A video or audio recording or data
generated from a video or audio recording; or

(C) Information collected, used or stored
for health care treatment, payment or operations under the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act.

(iii) "Governmental entity" means the state
including any of its branches, agencies, departments,
boards, instrumentalities or institutions and cities,
towns, counties, school districts, joint power boards,
airport boards, public corporations, special districts and
their governing bodies and all political subdivisions of
the state and their agencies, instrumentalities and
institutions. "Governmental entity" shall not include the
University of Wyoming, community college districts or
entities formed by a county memorial hospital, special
hospital district, rural health care district or senior
health care district that are wholly owned by one (1) or
more governmental entities.

9-30-102. Social scoring.

HB0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0258
(a) No governmental entity shall deploy, develop or
use an artificial intelligence system to evaluate or
classify a person or group of persons based on known,
inferred or predicted social behavior or personal
characteristics with the intent to calculate or assign a
social score or similar categorical estimation or valuation
of the person or group of persons that results or may
result in:

(i) Detrimental or unfavorable treatment of a
person or group of persons in a social context unrelated to
the context that the social behavior or personal
characteristics were observed or noted;

(ii) Detrimental or unfavorable treatment of a
person or group of persons that is unjustified or
disproportionate to the nature or gravity of the observed
or noted social behavior or personal characteristics; or

(iii) The infringement of any right guaranteed
under the United States constitution, the Wyoming
constitution or state or federal law.

HB0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0258
9-30-103. Biometric data.

No governmental entity shall deploy, develop or use an
artificial intelligence system for the purpose of
identifying a specific person by using biometric data or
the bulk or automated gathering of images or other media
from the internet or any other publicly available source
without the person's consent if the use of biometric data
or gathering of images or other media would infringe on any
right guaranteed under the United States constitution, the
Wyoming constitution or state or federal law.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0091